NLP - Project/maithili/maithili-val.dix
	<pardef n = "sawruvo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "allUbo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kuvazvo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gehuzvo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kroXavo/kroXavahu/kroXavAZWNJseho/kroXavahuz">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "suwazvo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gosaiMyahoM">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sarisoMbo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kariya">
	  <e><p><l>kko</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>vA</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	
  </pardefs>
